Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1006
Reversion of property.

In the event that such district or districts as are created under section 13-1003 in relation to one or more states, shall for any reason cease to exist, then all real and personal property acquired by deed, gift, purchase or otherwise shall, in its proportionate share as such territory in one state may bear to the other state, revert to the state or the district or districts having jurisdiction thereof.

Laws 1935, c. 39, § 6, p. 156;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1706;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-906.